Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 4
HOME SOLICITATION SALES

5-3-401. Definitions - "home solicitation sale".

"Home solicitation sale" means a consumer credit sale of goods or services in which the seller or a person acting for the seller personally solicits the sale and the buyer's agreement or offer to purchase is given to the seller or a person acting for the seller at a residence. It does not include a sale made pursuant to a preexisting revolving credit account, a sale made pursuant to prior negotiations between the parties at a business establishment at a fixed location where goods or services are offered or exhibited for sale, a transaction conducted and consummated entirely by mail or telephone, or a sale that is subject to the provisions of the federal "Truth in Lending Act" on the consumer's right to rescind certain transactions.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1222, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-501, as it existed prior to 2000.

Cross references:

For the definition and federal statutory cite of the "Truth in Lending Act", see § 5-1-302.

5-3-402. Buyer's right to cancel.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, in addition to any right otherwise to revoke an offer, the buyer has the right to cancel a home solicitation sale until midnight of the third business day after the day on which the buyer signs an agreement or offer to purchase that complies with this part 4.

Cancellation occurs when the buyer gives written notice of cancellation to the seller at the address stated in the agreement or offer to purchase.

Notice of cancellation, if given by mail, is given when it is deposited in a mail box properly addressed and postage prepaid.

Notice of cancellation given by the buyer need not take a particular form and is sufficient if it indicates by any form of written expression the intention of the buyer not to be bound by the home solicitation sale.

The buyer may not cancel a home solicitation sale if, by separate dated and signed statement that is not as to its material provisions a printed form and describes an emergency requiring immediate remedy, the buyer requests the seller to provide goods or services without delay in order to safeguard the health, safety, or welfare of natural persons or to prevent damage to property the buyer owns or for which the buyer is responsible, and:

The seller in good faith makes a substantial beginning of performance of the contract before the buyer gives notice of cancellation; and

In the case of goods, the goods cannot be returned to the seller in substantially as good condition as when received by the buyer.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1222, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-502, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-3-403. Form of agreement or offer - statement of buyer's rights.

In a home solicitation sale, unless the buyer requests the seller to provide goods or services without delay in an emergency, the seller must present to the buyer, and obtain his signature to, a written agreement or offer to purchase that designates as the date of the transaction the date on which the buyer actually signs and contains a statement of the buyer's rights that complies with subsection (2) of this section. A copy of any writing required by this subsection (1) to be signed by the buyer, completed at least as to the date of the transaction and the name and mailing address of the seller, shall be given to the buyer at the time the buyer signs the writing.

The statement shall comply with any notice of cancellation or a similar requirement of any trade regulation rule of the federal trade commission that by its terms applies to the home solicitation sale.

Until the seller has complied with this section, the buyer may cancel the home solicitation sale by notifying the seller in any manner and by any means of the buyer's intention to cancel; except that the buyer's right of cancellation shall expire three years after the date of the consummation of the home solicitation sale, notwithstanding the fact that the seller has not complied with this part 4.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1223, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-503, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-3-404. Restoration of down payment.

Within ten days after a notice of cancellation has been received by the seller or an offer to purchase has been otherwise revoked, the seller shall tender to the buyer any payments made by the buyer, any note or other evidence of indebtedness, and any goods traded in. A provision permitting the seller to keep all or any part of any goods traded in, payment, note, or other evidence of indebtedness is in violation of this section and unenforceable.

If the down payment includes goods traded in, the goods shall be tendered in substantially as good condition as when received by the seller. If the seller fails to tender the goods as provided by this section, the buyer may elect to recover an amount equal to the trade-in allowance stated in the agreement.

Until the seller has complied with the obligations imposed by this section, the buyer may retain possession of goods delivered to the buyer by the seller and has a lien on the goods in the buyer's possession or control for any recovery to which the buyer is entitled.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1223, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-504, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-3-405. Duty of buyer - no compensation for services prior to cancellation.

Except as provided by the provisions on retention of goods by the buyer contained in section 5-3-404 (3) and allowing for ordinary wear and tear or consumption of the goods contemplated by the transaction, within a reasonable time after a home solicitation sale has been canceled or an offer to purchase revoked, the buyer upon demand must tender to the seller any goods delivered by the seller pursuant to the sale, but the buyer is not obligated to tender at any place other than the buyer's residence. If the seller fails to demand possession of goods within a reasonable time after cancellation or revocation, the goods become the property of the buyer without obligation to pay for them. For the purpose of this section, forty days is presumed to be a reasonable time.

The buyer has a duty to take reasonable care of the goods in his or her possession before cancellation or revocation and for a reasonable time thereafter during which time the goods are otherwise at the seller's risk.

If a home solicitation sale is canceled, the seller is not entitled to compensation for any services the seller performed pursuant to it.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1224, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-505, as it existed prior to 2000.